Missouri, session 2026, SB1072.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 1.355, to read as
follows:
1.355. 1. The state of Missouri shall be exempt from
the advancement of the time provision known as Daylight
Saving Time as provided in 15 U.S.C. Section 260a.
2. The state of Missouri and its political
subdivisions shall at all times observe the standard time of
the United States as provided in 15 U.S.C. Sections 261 to
263.
Section B. The provisions of section A of this act
shall be effective on November 1, 2026.
✓